Hawaii, session 2026, SB629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, as amended, is amended by adding a new section to title 2 to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§   . Monthly accountability reports; beneficiaries.  (a)  The department of Hawaiian home lands shall each month mail to each beneficiary of this Act accountability reports.  The accountability reports shall additionally be posted on the department of Hawaiian home lands' website each month; provided that the department of Hawaiian home lands may include the accountability reports in any existing monthly reports posted on that website; provided further that no beneficiary shall be required to hold a lease under this Act as a condition precedent to obtaining access to any accountability report released pursuant to this subsection. (b)  Each accountability report pursuant to subsection (a) shall include, with respect to each monthly period: (1)  An accounting of expenditures for all interests in land leases awarded pursuant to section 207 that were exchanged or sold between beneficiaries; and (2)  An accounting of the department's expenditures of general revenue and a summary of the status of the funds and accounts identified in section 213." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________